Hawaii statutes.
[§521-80] Early termination of tenancy;
victims of domestic violence. (a) A tenant may terminate a rental
agreement of a term of one year or less without penalty or fees for early
termination or liability for future rent if the tenant or an immediate family
member of the tenant residing at the dwelling unit has been the victim of
domestic violence during the ninety days preceding the date the notice of early
termination is provided to the landlord. The notice shall be given at least
fourteen days prior to the early termination date specified in the notice,
which shall be no more than one hundred four days from the date of the most
recent act of domestic violence. The notice shall be accompanied by one of the
following documents:

(1) A copy of a valid order of protection issued by a
court of any state to the tenant or immediate family member of the tenant as a
result of the tenant or the immediate family member of the tenant having been a
victim of domestic violence;

(2) A copy of a police report filed with an agency of
any state that states that the tenant or immediate family member of the tenant
was a victim of domestic violence; or

(3) A copy of the conviction of a person for an act
of domestic violence against the tenant or immediate family member of the
tenant.

The tenant shall also provide to the landlord a
written statement, which describes that the tenant reasonably believes that the
person who committed the domestic violence knows the address or location where
the tenant or immediate family member of the tenant resides, unless the person
who committed the domestic violence resides in the same dwelling unit.

(b) If the tenant is solely liable on the
rental agreement, the rental agreement shall terminate on the early termination
date described in subsection (a), and the tenant shall be liable for rent owed
through the early termination date plus any previous obligations outstanding as
of that date. The amount due from the tenant shall be paid to the landlord on
or before the early termination date.

(c) If there are multiple tenants who are
parties to the rental agreement, the release of one or more tenants under this
section shall not terminate the rental agreement with respect to the other
non-terminating tenants; provided that the other non-terminating tenants
demonstrate an ability to pay the rent under the rental agreement, as
determined by the landlord. If the other non-terminating tenants fail to
demonstrate an ability to pay the rent, the landlord may terminate the rental
agreement by giving notice of early termination to the other non-terminating
tenants at least fourteen days prior to the early termination date specified in
the notice; provided that the landlord shall not assess any penalty or fees for
the early termination. The amount due from the other non-terminating tenants
shall be paid to the landlord on or before the early termination date.

The landlord shall not be required to refund
security deposits under section 521-44 or prepaid rent until:

(1) The rental agreement terminates with respect to
all tenants and the dwelling unit is surrendered to the landlord; or

(2) Early termination is effected pursuant to this
subsection, in which case each terminating tenant shall receive a prorated
share of any security deposit or prepaid rent from the landlord upon
termination of the rental agreement; provided that the percentage of any
security deposit to be returned shall be determined by the court or by the
parties in writing; provided further that if there is no determination made by the
court or by the parties regarding the percentage share of the security deposit,
the landlord shall be permitted to refund the security deposit in equal shares
to each tenant on the rental agreement.

(d) If a tenant submits notice of early
termination in compliance with this section, the landlord shall:

(1) Return a prorated share of all security deposits
recoverable by the terminating tenant under section 521-44 and prepaid rent
recoverable by the terminating tenant following the tenant's surrender of the
dwelling unit, except as otherwise provided in subsection (c); provided that
the landlord may withhold a prorated amount of the security deposit for payment
of damages that the landlord has suffered by reason of the terminating tenant's
noncompliance with section 521-51;

(2) Not assess any fee or penalty against the
terminating tenant for exercising any right granted under this section; and

(3) Not disclose any information reported to the
landlord under this section unless:

(A) The tenant consents to the disclosure of
the information in a statement signed by the tenant;

(B) The information is required or is
relevant in a judicial action; or

(C) The disclosure is required by other law.

(e) The landlord may recover from the person
who committed domestic violence against the tenant or tenant's immediate family
member actual damages resulting from the tenant's exercise of rights under this
section. In addition, if the person who committed domestic violence is a party
to the rental agreement, the landlord may:

(1) Allow the person to remain in possession of the
dwelling unit and hold the person liable on the rental agreement for all future
rents payable thereunder; or

(2) Terminate the person's interest under the rental
agreement by notifying the person in writing at least five days in advance of
the anticipated termination. The landlord may evict the person if the person
fails to vacate the dwelling unit on the specified termination date.

(f) If a tenant knowingly submits false notice
or accompanying documentation to a landlord in support of the right to be
released from the rental agreement under this section, the landlord may recover
an amount equal to three months periodic rent or threefold actual damages,
whichever is greater, plus costs and reasonable attorney's fees.

(g) The person who committed domestic violence
against the tenant or immediate family member of the tenant shall not be
entitled to any damages or other relief against the landlord or tenant who
complies with this section in good faith.

(h) This section shall not affect a tenant's
liability for delinquent, unpaid rent, or other amounts owed to the landlord
before the rental agreement was terminated by the tenant under this section. [L
2015, c 220, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next